Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Distilled spirits, public
safety, administration and
agency support.......................... $148,606,774
(2) Marijuana regulation
- recreational ............................ $ 34,278,768
(3) Marijuana regulation
- medical ................................... $ 7,141,879
(4) Agents’ compensation
- all other .................................. $175,666,624
(5) Agents’ compensation
- distillery agents ...................... $ 10,947,086
(6) Capital improvements ............... $ 258,159
(7) Debt service .............................. $ 27,856,722
SECTION 2.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by  the Oregon Liquor
and Cannabis Commission for liquor purchases are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 2